Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1072
Fraternal benefit society.

Any incorporated society, order, or supreme lodge, without capital stock, including one exempted under subdivision (1)(b) of section 44-10,109 whether incorporated or not, conducted solely for the benefit of its members and their beneficiaries and not for profit, operated on a lodge system with ritualistic form of work, having a representative form of government, and which provides benefits in accordance with sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109, is hereby declared to be a fraternal benefit society.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 1.